California statutes. Vehicle Code
An owner who has made a bona fide sale or transfer of a vehicle and has delivered possession of the vehicle to a purchaser is not, by reason of any of the provisions of this code, the owner of the vehicle so as to be subject to civil liability or criminal liability for the parking, abandoning, or operation of the vehicle thereafter by another when the selling or transferring owner, in addition to that delivery and that bona fide sale or transfer, has fulfilled either of the following requirements:

(a) He or she has made proper endorsement and delivery of the certificate of ownership as provided in this code.

(b) He or she has delivered to the department or has placed in the United States mail, addressed to the department, either of the following documents:

(1) The notice as provided in subdivision (b) of Section 4456 or Section 5900 or 5901.

(2) The appropriate documents and fees for registration of the vehicle to the new owner pursuant to the sale or transfer.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 180, Sec. 6.   Effective July 11, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

5603.

A legal owner may assign his title or interest in or to a vehicle registered under this code to a person other than the owner without the consent of and without affecting the interest of the owner.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1959, Ch. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

5604.

Every dealer who, upon transferring by sale, lease, or otherwise, any new or used vehicle of a type subject to registration, requires the transferee to insure the vehicle, and every lending agency which, as the holder of any security interest in the vehicle, requires its obligor to insure the vehicle, shall, if the required insurance policy is obtained by the dealer or lending agency and the policy does not insure the transferee or obligor against damages resulting from ownership or operation of the vehicle arising by reason of personal injury or death of any person, or from injury to property, notify the transferee or obligor of that fact in writing on a
 document other than the insurance policy. The document shall be in duplicate and signed by the transferee or obligor.

If the required insurance policy is obtained by the dealer or lending agency because of the failure or refusal of the transferee or obligor to furnish or renew insurance in accordance with the terms of the contract of sale or the security agreement, and the policy does not insure the transferee or obligor against damages resulting from ownership or operation of the vehicle arising by reason of personal injury or death of any person, or from injury to property, the dealer or lending agency shall notify the transferee or obligor that the policy obtained does not insure the transferee or obligor for liability from any claims. The notice shall be made in writing on a document other than the insurance policy, or the declaration page attached to the policy, and shall be mailed, with postage paid and properly addressed, to the transferee or obligor within
 30 days of obtaining the policy.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1407, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

5604.5.

(a) Every dealer who, upon transferring by sale, lease, or otherwise, any new or used vehicle of a type subject to registration, requires the transferee to insure the motor vehicle shall, if the required insurance policy is sold by that dealer at the time of the transfer and the policy does not insure the transferee against damages resulting from ownership or operation of the vehicle arising by reason of personal injury or death of any person, or from damage to property, notify the transferee of that fact in writing on a document other than
 the insurance policy. The document shall be signed by the transferee and an exact copy shall be furnished to the transferee by the dealer at the time of signature.

(b) The document required under subdivision (a) shall contain a notice in English and Spanish in at least 10-point type that reads as follows:

“INSURANCE WARNING

The motor vehicle physical damage insurance policy you are buying does not allow you to legally drive on the streets of California. Generally, in order to legally drive on the streets of California, you must either purchase a type of insurance called “liability insurance” or deposit a bond with the Department of Motor Vehicles. If you drive this or any other motor vehicle without liability insurance or a bond, a police officer may request evidence of liability insurance or a bond at the time of a traffic stop. If you do not have
 evidence of liability insurance or a bond during a traffic stop, the fines can be from several hundreds of dollars to an amount that exceeds $1,000. If you get into an accident and do not have liability insurance or a bond, you will lose your driver’s license for one year. If you cause the accident and do not have liability insurance or a bond, you may have to pay the injured person yourself and these costs may be substantial.

Liability insurance as well as the insurance needed to obtain a loan for your motor vehicle may be purchased through a licensed insurance agent or broker. The price for both types of insurance may be more or less than the price for the insurance you are being offered by the dealer. The State of California advises you to shop for insurance because prices may vary substantially.

I have read this notice and understand that I am about to buy a type of insurance that is available elsewhere and that does
 not allow me to drive the motor vehicle legally on the streets of California.

I also understand that if I drive on the streets of California without liability insurance or a bond, then I may be subject to severe financial penalties, including fines and personal payment for any damage to others that I may cause while driving.(Spanish translation of the above text to be 
developed by the Department of Motor 
Vehicles and to be inserted below the above 
English version text)
Dated: Signed: ”(c) The department shall also make available a translation of the Insurance Warning notice set forth in subdivision (b) in any of the languages used in the most recent statewide voter pamphlet.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 455, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Endorsement and Delivery of Documents [5750. - 5753.]

5750.

Upon transfer of the title or any interest of the legal owner or owners in a vehicle registered under this code, the transferor shall write his signature, and the transferee shall write his signature and address, in the appropriate spaces provided on the certificate of ownership issued for the vehicle.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1967, Ch. 723.)
-------------------------------------------

5751.

Upon transfer of the title or interest of the registered owner only in a vehicle registered under this code, the registered owner shall write his signature and address and the transferee shall write his signature and address in the appropriate spaces provided on the certificate of ownership for the vehicle, and the legal owner shall write his signature in the space provided for the new legal owner indicating that he is to retain his legal title and interest.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1967, Ch. 723.)
-------------------------------------------

5751.5.

(a) Upon transfer of the title or interest of the registered owner of a motor vehicle that is subject to Part 5 (commencing with Section 43000) of Division 26 of the Health and Safety Code, if no certificate of compliance or certificate of noncompliance is submitted to the department pursuant to the exemptions described in paragraph (1) of subdivision (d) of Section 4000.1, the transferor of that vehicle shall sign and deliver to the transferee, upon completion of the transaction, the original copy of a statement, under penalty of perjury,
 that he or she has not modified the emissions system of the vehicle and does not have any personal knowledge of anyone else modifying the system in a manner that causes the emission system to fail to qualify for the issuance of a certificate of compliance pursuant to Section 44015 of the Health and Safety Code. The transferor shall keep a duplicate copy of the statement delivered to the transferee pursuant to this section. The department shall prescribe and make available to transferors the necessary forms to comply with this subdivision.

(b) Any form prescribed by the department pursuant to subdivision (a) shall contain the following statement and a space for the signatures of the transferor and transferee at the end of the statement:

“WARNING TO THE BUYER

“A valid certificate of compliance was submitted to the Department of Motor Vehicles with an
 application for the renewal of registration of this vehicle. If an application for transfer is submitted to the department within the 90-day validity period of the smog certification, no new smog certification will be required. However, at present, you may be purchasing a vehicle that may not be in compliance with specified emission standards.

“By signing this statement, you acknowledge that the seller is not required to provide you with an additional certificate of compliance prior to the completion of this transaction.

“You may have this vehicle tested at a licensed smog check station prior to completion of this transaction to verify compliance. If the vehicle passes the test, you shall be responsible for the costs of the test. If the vehicle fails the test, the seller is obligated to reimburse you the cost of having the vehicle tested and, without expense to you, must have the vehicle repaired to comply with specified
 emission standards prior to completion of this transaction.(Transferor)(Date)(Transferee) (Date)”

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 650, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

5752.

(a) When the required certificate of ownership is lost, stolen, damaged, or mutilated, the application for transfer may be made upon a form provided by the department for a duplicate certificate of ownership. The transferor shall write his or her signature and address in the appropriate spaces provided upon the application and file the same together with the proper fees for duplicate certificate of ownership and transfer. The application shall also include, if applicable, the notorized signature of the lienholder.

(b) An insurance company or its agent is exempt from the notarized signature requirement of subdivision (a) and may apply, upon a form provided by the department, for a duplicate certificate of ownership and transfer of ownership to the insurance company, if all of the following occur:

(1) The insurance company or its agent obtains from the lienholder a document to verify satisfaction of the lien.

(2) The insurance company has paid a total loss claim for the vehicle.

(3) A lienholder is indicated on the department’s records.

(4) The certificate of ownership is lost, stolen, damaged, or mutilated.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 451, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

5753.

(a) It is unlawful for any person to fail or neglect properly to endorse, date, and deliver the certificate of ownership and, when having possession, to deliver the registration card to a transferee who is lawfully entitled to a transfer of registration.

(b) Except when the certificate of ownership is demanded in writing by a purchaser, a vehicle dealer licensed under this code shall satisfy the delivery requirement of this section by submitting appropriate documents and fees to
 the department for transfer of registration in accordance with Sections 5906 and 4456 of this code and rules and regulations promulgated thereunder.

(c) (1) Within 15 business days after receiving payment in full for the satisfaction of a security interest and a written instrument signed by the grantor of the security interest designating the transferee and authorizing release of the legal owner’s interest, the legal owner shall release its security interest and mail, transmit, or deliver the vehicle’s certificate of ownership to the transferee who, due to satisfaction of the security interest, is lawfully entitled to the transfer of legal ownership.

(2) If a lease provides a lessee with the option to purchase the leased vehicle, within 15 business days after receiving payment in full for the purchase, and all documents necessary to effect the transfer, the
 lessor shall mail, transmit, or deliver the vehicle’s certificate of ownership to the transferee, who, due to purchase of the vehicle, is lawfully entitled to the transfer of legal ownership.

(d) The certificate of ownership delivered pursuant to subdivision (c) shall be signed by the legal owner or lessor to reflect release of the legal owner’s interest or transfer of the lessor’s interest in the vehicle or accompanied by a form provided by the department to accomplish the same result and signed by the legal owner or lessor. If the legal owner or lessor is not in possession or control of the certificate of ownership, the legal owner or lessor shall, within the time provided in subdivision (c) for the mailing, transmittal, or delivery of the certificate of ownership, take any action required by the department to release the legal owner’s security interest or transfer the lessor’s interest in the vehicle and within that time shall mail,
 transmit, or deliver written notice of its taking that action to the transferee.

(e) A legal owner or lessor that fails to satisfy the requirements of subdivisions (c) and (d), shall, without offset or reduction, pay the transferee twenty-five dollars ($25) per day for each day that the requirements of subdivisions (c) and (d) remain unsatisfied, not to exceed a maximum payment of two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500). If the legal owner or lessor fails to pay this amount within 60 days following written demand by the transferee, the amount shall be trebled, not to exceed a maximum payment of seven thousand five hundred dollars ($7,500), and the transferee shall be entitled to costs and reasonable attorneys fees incurred in any court action brought to collect the payment. The right to recover these payments is cumulative with and is not in substitution or derogation of any remedy otherwise available at law or equity.

(f) A legal owner, upon written request of the transferee, shall disclose any pertinent information regarding the amount of payment and the documents necessary to release the obligation secured by the legal owner’s interest.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 151, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Notice and Application [5900. - 5912.]

5900.

(a) Whenever the owner of a vehicle registered under this code sells or transfers his or her title or interest in, and delivers the possession of, the vehicle to another, the owner shall, within five calendar days, notify the department of the sale or transfer giving the date thereof, the name and address of the owner and of the transferee, and the description of the vehicle that is required in the appropriate form provided for that purpose by the department.

(b) Except as
 otherwise provided in subdivision (c), pursuant to subsection (a) of Section 32705 of Title 49 of the United States Code, the owner shall also notify the department of the actual mileage of the vehicle as indicated by the vehicle’s odometer at the time of sale or transfer. However, if the vehicle owner has knowledge that the mileage displayed on the odometer is incorrect, the owner shall indicate on the appropriate form the true mileage, if known, of the vehicle at the time of sale or transfer.

Providing false or inaccurate mileage is not a violation of this subdivision unless it is done with the intent to defraud.

(c) If the registered owner is not in possession of the vehicle that is sold or transferred, the person in physical possession of that vehicle shall give the notice required by subdivisions (a) and (b). If the registered owner sells or transfers the vehicle through a dealer conducting a
 wholesale motor vehicle auction, the owner shall furnish the information required by subdivisions (a) and (b) to that dealer.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1035, Sec. 11.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

5901.

(a) Every dealer or lessor-retailer, upon transferring by sale, lease, or otherwise any vehicle, whether new or used, of a type subject to registration under this code, shall, not later than the end of the fifth calendar day thereafter not counting the day of sale, give notice of the transfer to the department electronically in a manner approved by the department.

(b) Except as otherwise provided in this subdivision or in subdivision (c), the dealer or lessor-retailer shall enter on the form and pursuant to Section 32705(a) of Title 49 of the United States Code, on the ownership certificate, the actual mileage of the vehicle as indicated by the
 vehicle’s odometer at the time of the transfer. However, if the vehicle dealer or lessor-retailer has knowledge that the mileage displayed on the odometer is incorrect, the licensee shall indicate on the form on which the mileage is entered that the mileage registered by the odometer is incorrect. A vehicle dealer or lessor-retailer need not give the notice when selling or transferring a new unregistered vehicle to a dealer or lessor-retailer.

(c) When the dealer or lessor-retailer is not in possession of the vehicle that is sold or transferred, the person in physical possession of the vehicle shall give the information required by subdivision (b).

(d) A sale is deemed completed and consummated when the purchaser of the vehicle has paid the purchase price, or, in lieu thereof,
 has signed a purchase contract or security agreement, and has taken physical possession or delivery of the vehicle.

(e) This section shall become operative January 1, 2019.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 19) and added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 90, Sec. 20.   (AB 516)   Effective January 1, 2017.   Section operative January 1, 2019, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

5902.

Whenever any person has received as transferee a properly endorsed certificate of ownership, that person shall, within 10 days thereafter, forward the certificate with the proper transfer fee to the department and thereby make application for a transfer of registration. The certificate of ownership shall contain a space for the applicant’s driver’s license or identification card number, and the applicant shall furnish that number, if any, in the space provided.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 826, Sec. 18.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

5902.5.

(a) If an application for a registration transaction is filed with the department during the 30 days immediately preceding the date of expiration of registration of the vehicle, the application shall be accompanied by the full renewal fees for the ensuing registration year in addition to any other fees that are due and payable.

(b) The
 requirements of subdivision (a) shall not apply if the expiration of registration occurs on or after July 1, 2011. This subdivision shall become inoperative on January 1, 2012.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 21, Sec. 5.   (SB 94)   Effective May 4, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

5903.

When the department receives a copy of the judgment of abandonment and evidence of sale as specified in Section 798.61 of the Civil Code, the department shall transfer the registration of the trailer coach or recreational vehicle which has been deemed abandoned pursuant to that section, or reregister the trailer coach or vehicle under a new registration number, and issue a new certificate of ownership and registration card to the person or persons presenting the copy of the judgment of abandonment and evidence of sale to the department.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 564, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

5904.

Whenever the ownership of any vehicle for which a certificate of ownership has been issued without registration under Section 4452 is transferred, an application for transfer shall be made as provided in this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1961, Ch. 58.)
-------------------------------------------

5905.

When a security interest upon a registered vehicle is satisfied, canceled, or released by the parties thereto duly registered as owner and legal owner respectively and thereafter within a period of 10 days a new security agreement covering the vehicle is executed between the same parties, no application for transfer of registration by reason thereof shall be made and no new certificate of ownership or registration card shall be issued, and all provisions of this code relating to transfers of any title or interest in a vehicle and the registration of the transfers shall be deemed to have been fully complied with, and the new security agreement shall be deemed perfected at the
 time the new security agreement is executed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1963, Ch. 819.)
-------------------------------------------

5906.

When the transferee of a vehicle is a dealer who holds the same for resale and operates or moves the same upon the highways under special plates, the dealer is not required to make application for transfer, but upon transferring his title or interest to another person he shall comply with this division.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1959, Ch. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

5906.5.

(a) Except as otherwise provided in subdivision (b), in the case of any transfer, including, but not limited to, a transfer resulting from a sale, lease, gift, or auction, of a vehicle under 6,001 pounds, manufacturer’s maximum gross weight rating, where no application for transfer is required, the person making such transfer, or his authorized representative, shall sign and shall record on the document evidencing the transfer of the vehicle the actual mileage of the vehicle as indicated by the vehicle’s odometer at the time of the transfer. However, if the person making the transfer, or his authorized representative, has knowledge that the mileage
 displayed on the odometer is incorrect, such person shall record on the document the true mileage, if known, of the vehicle at the time of transfer.

(b) Whenever the person making such transfer is not in possession of the vehicle that is transferred, the person in physical possession of such vehicle shall provide the information required by subdivision (a).

(History: Amended by Stats. 1978, Ch. 797.)
-------------------------------------------

5907.

A secured party who holds a security interest in a registered vehicle that constitutes inventory as defined in the Uniform Commercial Code, who has possession of the certificate of ownership issued for that vehicle, if the certificate of ownership has been issued, need not make application for a transfer of registration and the Uniform Commercial Code shall exclusively control the validity and perfection of that security interest. This section does not apply to the extent that subdivisions (a) to (c), inclusive, of Section 9311 of the Uniform Commercial Code apply
 to a security interest, because the transaction is not described in subdivision (d) of Section 9311 of that code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 235, Sec. 9.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

5908.

The transferee of a security interest in a registered vehicle need not make application for a transfer of registration when the interest of such transferee arises from a transfer of a security agreement or a lease agreement by the legal owner to the transferee to secure payment or performance of an obligation, and the Uniform Commercial Code shall exclusively control the validity and perfection of such a security interest.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1963, Ch. 819.)
-------------------------------------------

5909.

(a) Whenever the title or interest of any owner or legal owner in or to a vehicle registered under this code passes to another otherwise than by voluntary transfer the new owner or legal owner may obtain a transfer of registration upon application therefor and upon presentation of the last certificate of ownership and registration card issued for the vehicle, if available, and any instruments or documents of authority or certified copies thereof as may be required by the department, or required by law, to evidence or effect a transfer of title or interest in or to chattels in such case.

(b) The department when satisfied of the genuineness and regularity of the transfer shall give notice by mail to the owner and legal owner of the vehicle as shown by the records of the department and five days after the giving of the notice, if still satisfied of the genuineness and regularity of such transfer, shall transfer the registration of the vehicle accordingly. Such notice shall not be required for a transfer described in Section 5601.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1969, Ch. 384.)
-------------------------------------------

5910.

(a) Upon the death of an owner or legal owner of a vehicle registered under this code, without the decedent leaving other property necessitating probate, and irrespective of the value of the vehicle, the following person or persons may secure transfer of registration of the title or interest of the decedent: 

(1) The sole person or all of the persons who succeeded to the property of the decedent under Sections 6401 and 6402 of the Probate Code unless the vehicle is, by will, otherwise bequeathed.

(2) The
 sole beneficiary or all of the beneficiaries who succeeded to the vehicle under the will of the decedent where the vehicle is, by will, so bequeathed.

(b) The person authorized by subdivision (a) may secure a transfer of registration of the title or interest of the decedent upon presenting to the department all of the following:

(1) The appropriate certificate of ownership and registration card, if available.

(2) A certificate of the heir or beneficiary under penalty of perjury containing the following statements:

(A) The date and place of the decedent’s death.

(B) The decedent left no other property necessitating probate and no probate proceeding is now being or has been conducted in this
 state for the decedent’s estate.

(C) The declarant is entitled to the vehicle either (i) as the sole person or all of the persons who succeeded to the property of the decedent under Sections 6401 and 6402 of the Probate Code if the decedent left no will or (ii) as the beneficiary or beneficiaries under the decedent’s last will if the decedent left a will, and no one has a right to the decedent’s vehicle that is superior to that of the declarant.

(D) There are no unsecured creditors of the decedent or, if there are, the unsecured creditors of the decedent have been paid in full or their claims have been otherwise discharged.

(3) If required by the department, a certificate of the death of the decedent. 

(4) If required by the department, the names and
 addresses of any other heirs or beneficiaries.

(c) If the department is presented with the documents specified in paragraphs (1) and (2) of subdivision (b), no liability shall be incurred by the department or any officer or employee of the department by reason of the transfer of registration of the vehicle pursuant to this section. The department or officer or employee of the department may rely in good faith on the statements in the certificate specified in paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) and has no duty to inquire into the truth of any statement in the certificate. The person who secures the transfer of the vehicle pursuant to this section is subject to the provisions of Sections 13109 to 13113, inclusive, of the Probate Code to the same extent as a person to whom transfer of property is made under Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 13100) of Part 1 of Division 8 of the Probate Code.

(d) The department may prescribe a combined form for use under this section and Section 9916.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1986, Ch. 783, Sec. 26.   Operative July 1, 1987, by Sec. 30 of Ch. 783.)
-------------------------------------------

5910.5.

(a) On death of the owner of a vehicle owned in beneficiary form, the vehicle belongs to the surviving beneficiary, if any. If there is no surviving beneficiary, the vehicle belongs to the estate of the deceased owner or of the last coowner to die. 

(b) A certificate of ownership in beneficiary form may be revoked or the beneficiary changed at any time before the death of the owner by either of the following methods: 

(1) By sale of the vehicle with proper assignment and delivery of the certificate of
 ownership to another person. 

(2) By application for a new certificate of ownership without designation of a beneficiary or with the designation of a different beneficiary. 

(c) Except as provided in subdivision (b), designation of a beneficiary in a certificate of ownership issued in beneficiary form may not be changed or revoked by will, by any other instrument, by a change of circumstances, or otherwise. 

(d) The beneficiary’s interest in the vehicle at death of the owner is subject to any contract of sale, assignment, or security interest to which the owner was subject during his or her lifetime. 

(e) The surviving beneficiary may secure a transfer of ownership for the vehicle upon presenting to the department all of the following: 

(1) The appropriate certificate of ownership. 

(2) A certificate under penalty of perjury stating the date and place of the owner’s death and that the declarant is entitled to the vehicle as the designated beneficiary. 

(3) If required by the department, a certificate of the death of the owner. 

(f) After the death of the owner, the surviving beneficiary may transfer his or her interest in the vehicle to another person without securing transfer of ownership into his or her own name by appropriately signing the certificate of ownership for the vehicle and delivering the document to the transferee for forwarding to the department with appropriate fees. The transferee may secure a transfer of ownership upon presenting to the department (1) the certificate of
 ownership signed by the beneficiary, (2) the certificate described in paragraph (2) of subdivision (e) executed by the beneficiary under penalty of perjury; and (3) if required by the department, a certificate of death of the owner. 

(g) A transfer at death pursuant to this section is effective by reason of this section, and shall not be deemed to be a testamentary disposition of property. The right of the designated beneficiary to the vehicle shall not be denied, abridged, or affected on the grounds that the right has not been created by a writing executed in accordance with the laws of this state prescribing the requirements to effect a valid testamentary disposition of property. 

(h) A transfer at death pursuant to this section is subject to Section 9653 of the Probate Code. 

(i) If there is no surviving
 beneficiary, the person or persons described in Section 5910 may secure transfer of the vehicle as provided in that section. 

(j) The department may prescribe forms for use pursuant to this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 1055, Sec. 59.   Operative January 1, 1993, by Sec. 64 of Ch. 1055.)
-------------------------------------------

5910.7.

(a) If the department makes a transfer pursuant to Section 5910.5, the department is discharged from all liability, whether or not the transfer is consistent with the beneficial ownership of the vehicle transferred. 

(b) The protection provided by subdivision (a) does not extend to a transfer made after the department has been served with a court order restraining the transfer. No other notice or information shown to have been available to the department shall affect its right to the protection afforded by subdivision (a). 

(c) The protection provided by this section has no bearing on the rights of parties in disputes between themselves or their successors concerning the beneficial ownership of the vehicle. 

(d) The protection provided by this section is in addition to, and not exclusive of, any other protection provided to the department by any other provision of law.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 1055, Sec. 60.   Operative January 1, 1993, by Sec. 64 of Ch. 1055.)
-------------------------------------------

5911.

Whenever application is made to the department for a transfer of registration of a vehicle to a new owner or legal owner and the applicant is unable to present the certificate of ownership issued for the vehicle by reason of the same being lost or otherwise not available, the department may receive the application and examine into the circumstances of the case and may require the filing of certifications or other information, and when the department is satisfied that the applicant is entitled to a transfer of registration the department may transfer the registration of the vehicle, or reregister the vehicle under a new registration number, and issue a new
 certificate of ownership and registration card to the person or persons found to be entitled thereto. The department, however, shall not issue a new certificate of ownership and registration card to the applicant if the department has received notice by registered or certified mail in which it is indicated that the existing ownership certificate is being held for nonpayment of the vehicle. The notice may be forwarded by the registered owner, recorded lienholder, or by a person exempted from recording ownership by Section 5906.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1268, Sec. 6.)
-------------------------------------------

5912.

Whenever application is made to the department for a transfer of registration of a vehicle to a new owner or legal owner and the applicant is unable to present the registration card issued for the vehicle by reason of the same being in the possession of the department upon an application for renewal of registration, the department may transfer the registration of such vehicle upon production of the properly endorsed certificate of ownership to the vehicle and a temporary receipt upon a form prescribed by the department and containing such information as the department shall deem necessary, including, but not limited to, the license number assigned to the vehicle for the
 ensuing registration year, the amount of the fees payable upon renewal of registration, and the vehicle identification number of the vehicle.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1973, Ch. 889.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Transfer by Department [6050. - 6052.]

6050.

(a) The department upon receipt of a properly endorsed certificate of ownership and the required fee shall reregister the vehicle under its registration number in the name of the new owner and new legal owner, if any, and shall issue a new registration card and certificate of ownership as provided upon an original registration.

(b) The department shall not issue a new registration card and certificate of ownership pursuant to subdivision (a) on a vehicle that has been issued a
 nonrepairable vehicle certificate pursuant to Section 11515.2.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1008, Sec. 10.   Effective January 1, 1995.   Operative July 1, 1995, by Sec. 19 of Ch. 1008.)
-------------------------------------------

6051.

If the application for a transfer is made in the manner provided in this code the department shall not be required to withhold the transfer of any right, title, or interest in or to a vehicle if the application on its face appears to be genuine and regular and the department has received neither a request from any law enforcement agency that action on the application be deferred nor an order of a court of the United States or of the State of California restraining the transfer within two years prior thereto.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1959, Ch. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

6052.

When application is made for transfer of the ownership of a vehicle for which a certificate of ownership has been issued without registration, upon payment of registration, transfer, and other fees required by law, the department shall issue the usual certificate of ownership and registration card unless the vehicle is not to be operated on the highways and the new owner submits an affidavit satisfactory to the department as to those facts required by subdivision (b) of Section 4452, in which case the new certificate of title and facsimile thereof may be issued as provided for in that section.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1959, Ch. 3.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Transfers Through Wholesale Auctions [6100. - 6105.]

6100.

(a) A dealer who conducts a wholesale motor vehicle auction and reports the sale of the vehicle in the manner prescribed in subdivision (b) of Section 4456 shall include the phrase “SOLD THROUGH [name of dealer conducting the auction]” and the date of the auction on the certificate of title of every vehicle sold, in a manner prescribed by the department.

(b) This section shall become operative January 1, 2019.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 21) and added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 90, Sec. 22.   (AB 516)   Effective January 1, 2017.   Section operative January 1, 2019, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

6102.

For each vehicle sold pursuant to this article, the dealer who conducts the auction shall maintain a copy of the following documents for a period of not less than five years:

(a) The form required by subdivision (b) of Section 4456.

(b) A copy of the auction sales agreement.

(c) A copy of the odometer statement required by Section 5900.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 180, Sec. 9.   Effective July 11, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

6104.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a dealer who purchases a vehicle pursuant to this article has the same rights and remedies against the dealer who conducts the auction sale as if that dealer were an owner and seller of the auctioned vehicle. The purchaser dealer’s rights and remedies are in addition to any right or remedy he or she may have against the seller of a vehicle sold at a wholesale motor vehicle auction. The provisions of this section may not be waived or modified by agreement, or by recharacterization of the transaction.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 745, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 1993.   Section operative July 1, 1993, pursuant to Section 6105.)
-------------------------------------------

6105.

This article shall become operative on July 1, 1993.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 745, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 1993.   Note: This section prescribes a delayed operative date (July 1, 1993) for Article 5, commencing with Section 6100.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 2.5. Miscellaneous Title Provisions [6150. - 6172.]



  ARTICLE 1. Certificate of Title as Evidence [6150. - 6154.]

6150.
